hw2/lexc/data/el-full.lexc
!!! el.lexc (Modern Greek) !!!
!!!   Adriana R. Flórez    !!!
!!!     EMPTY LEXICON      !!!
!! -------------------------!!

!! - Supported parts of speech: noun, adjective, verb
!! - Supported genders: masculine, feminine, neuter
!! - Supported numbers: singular, plural
!! - Supported persons: first, second, third
!! - Supported cases: nominative, genitive, accusative, vocative
!! - Supported adj. modifiers: comparative, superlative
!! - Supported verb tenses: present, past aorist, past imperfect, imperative, participle, gerund
Multichar_Symbols 
+N +A +V 
+Masc +Fem +Neut 
+Sg +Plur 
+1P +2P +3P 
+Nom +Gen +Acc +Voc 
+Comp +Sup 
+Present +Aorist +Imperfect +Imperative +Part +Gerund

!! Root lexicon: noun, adjective, verb
LEXICON Root 
        Noun ;
        Adj ;
        Verb ;

!! ------------------------------------------------------------

!! Masculine
LEXICON NounMascOs
+Ν+Sg+Nom:^ος # ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^ου # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^ο # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^ε # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^οι # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ους # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^οι # ;

LEXICON NounMascAs
+N+Sg+Nom:^ας # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^α # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^α # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^α # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;

LEXICON NounMascIs
+N+Sg+Nom:^ης # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^η # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^η # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^η # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;

!! Neuter
LEXICON NounNeutMa
+N+Sg+Nom:^μα # ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^ματος # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^μα # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^μα # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ματα # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^μάτων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ματα # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ματα # ;

LEXICON NounNeutI
+N+Sg+Nom:^ι # ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^ιου # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^ι # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^ι # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ια # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ίων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ια # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ια # ;

LEXICON NounNeutO
+N+Sg+Nom:^ο # ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^ου # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^ο # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^ο # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^α # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^α # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^α # ;

!! Feminine
LEXICON NounFemA
+N+Sg+Nom:^α # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^ας # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^α # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^α # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;

LEXICON NounFemI
+N+Sg+Nom:^η # ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^ης # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^η # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^η # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;



!! ------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON AdjOs1
+A+Masc: AdjMascOs1 ;
+A+Fem: AdjFemOs1 ;
+A+Neut: AdjNeutOs1 ;

!! Os1 class has 2 possibilities per comparative
!! (Depending on whether the noun forms it regularly or exceptionally irregular)
LEXICON AdjMascOs1
+Sg+Nom:^ός # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ού # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ό # ;
+Sg+Voc:^έ # ;
+Plur+Nom:^οί # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ούς # ;
+Plur+Voc:^οί # ;
+Comp:^ότερος AdjMascOs2 ; !! Canonical form
+Comp:^ύτερος AdjMascOs2 ; !! Irregular
+Sup:^ότατος AdjMascOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjFemOs1
+Sg+Nom:^ή # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ής # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ή # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ή # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ές # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ές # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ές # ;
+Comp1:^ότερη AdjFemOs2 ; !! Canonical form
+Comp2:^ήτερη AdjFemOs2 ; !! Irregular
+Sup:^ότατη AdjFemOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjNeutOs1
+Sg+Nom:^ό # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ού # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ό # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ό # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ά # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ά # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ά # ;
+Comp1:^ότερο AdjNeutOs2 ; !! Canonical form
+Comp2:^ύτερο AdjNeutOs2 ; !! Irregular
+Sup:^ότατο AdjNeutOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjOs2
+A+Masc: AdjMascOs2 ;
+A+Fem: AdjFemOs2 ;
+A+Neut: AdjNeutOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjMascOs2
+Sg+Nom:^ος # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ου # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ο # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ε # ;
+Plur+Nom:^οι # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ους # ;
+Plur+Voc:^οι # ;
+Comp:^ότερος AdjMascOs2 ;
+Sup:^ότατος AdjMascOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjFemOs2
+Sg+Nom:^η # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ης # ;
+Sg+Acc:^η # ;
+Sg+Voc:^η # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;
+Comp:^ότερη AdjFemOs2 ;
+Sup:^ότατη AdjFemOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjNeutOs2
+Sg+Nom:^ό # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ού # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ό # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ό # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ά # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ά # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ά # ;
+Comp:^ότερο AdjNeutOs2 ;
+Sup:^ότατο AdjNeutOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjIs1
+A+Masc: AdjMascIs1 ;
+A+Fem: AdjFemIs1 ;
+A+Neut: AdjNeutIs1 ;

LEXICON AdjMascIs1
+Sg+Nom:^ής # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ούς # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ή # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ή # ;
+Plur+Nom:^είς # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^είς # ;
+Plur+Voc:^είς # ;
+Comp:^έστερος AdjMascOs2 ;
+Sup:^έστατος AdjMascOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjFemIs1
+Sg+Nom:^ής # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ούς # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ή # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ή # ;
+Plur+Nom:^είς # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^είς # ;
+Plur+Voc:^είς # ;
+Comp:^έστερη AdjFemOs2 ;
+Sup:^έστατη AdjFemOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjNeutIs1
+Sg+Nom:^ές # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ούς # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ές # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ές # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ή # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ή # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ή # ;
+Comp:^έστερο AdjNeutOs2 ;
+Sup:^έστατο AdjNeutOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjIs2
+A+Masc: AdjMascIs2 ;
+A+Fem: AdjFemIs2 ;
+A+Neut: AdjNeutIs2 ;

LEXICON AdjMascIs2
+Sg+Nom:^ης # ;
+Sg+Gen:^η # ;
+Sg+Acc:^η # ;
+Sg+Voc:^η # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ηδες # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ηδων # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ηδες # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ηδες # ;
+Comp:^ηστερος AdjMascOs2 ;
+Sup:^ηστατος AdjMascOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjFemIs2
+Sg+Nom:^α # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ας # ;
+Sg+Acc:^α # ;
+Sg+Voc:^α # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;
+Comp:^ηστερη AdjFemOs2 ;
+Sup:^ηστατη AdjFemOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjNeutIs2
+Sg+Nom:^ικο # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ικου # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ικο # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ικο # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ικα # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ικων # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ικα # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ικα # ;
+Comp:^ηστερο AdjNeutOs2 ;
+Sup:^ηστατο AdjNeutOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjUs
+A+Masc: AdjMascUs ;
+A+Fem: AdjFemUs ;
+A+Neut: AdjNeutUs ;

LEXICON AdjMascUs
+Sg+Nom:^ύς # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ιού # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ύ # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ύ # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ιοί # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ιών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ιούς # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ιοί # ;
+Comp:^ύτερος AdjMascOs2 ;
+Sup:^ύτατος AdjMascOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjFemUs
+Sg+Nom:^ιά # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ιάς # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ιά # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ιά # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ιές # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ιών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ιές # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ιές # ;
+Comp:^ύτερη AdjFemOs2 ;
+Sup:^ύτατη AdjFemOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjNeutUs
+Sg+Nom:^ύ # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ιού # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ύ # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ύ # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ιά # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ιών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ιά # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ιά # ;
+Comp:^ύτερο AdjNeutOs2 ;
+Sup:^ύτατο AdjFemOs2 ;


!! ------------------------------------------------------------
!! VERBS

!! Alpha conjugation (ending in -νω, past aor. in -σα)
LEXICON VerbA
+V+Infinitive:^ω # ;           
+V+Present+Sg+1P:^ω # ;           
+V+Present+Sg+2P:^εις # ;
+V+Present+Sg+3P:^ει # ;
+V+Present+Plur+1P:^ουμε # ;
+V+Present+Plur+2P:^ετε # ;
+V+Present+Plur+3P:^ουν # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+1P:^^α # ;       
+V+Aorist+Sg+2P:^^ες # ;      
+V+Aorist+Sg+3P:^^ε # ;       
+V+Aorist+Plur+1P:^^αμε # ;    
+V+Aorist+Plur+2P:^^ατε # ;   
+V+Aorist+Plur+3P:^^αν # ;     
+V+Imperfect+Sg+1P:^α # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+2P:^ες # ; 
+V+Imperfect+Sg+3P:^ε # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+1P:^αμε # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+2P:^ατε # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+3P:^αν # ;
+V+Imperative+Sg:^ε # ;         
+V+Imperative+Plur:^τε # ;
+V+Gerund:^οντας # ;
+V+Part:^ει #;

!! Passive conjugation (past aor. in -θηκα)
LEXICON VerbPath1
+V+Infinitive:^ομαι
+V+Present+Sg+1P:^ομαι # ;
+V+Present+Sg+2P:^ασαι # ;
+V+Present+Sg+3P:^αται # ;
+V+Present+Plur+1P:^αμαστε # ;
+V+Present+Plur+2P:^αστε # ;
+V+Present+Plur+3P:^ωνται # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+1P:^θηκα # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+2P:^θηκες # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+3P:^θηκε # ;
+V+Aorist+Plur+1P:^θηκαμε # ;
+V+Aorist+Plur+2P:^θηκατε # ;
+V+Aorist+Plur+3P:^θηκαν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+1P:^όμουν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+2P:^όσουν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+3P:^όταν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+1P:^όμασταν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+2P:^όσασταν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+3P:^όνταν # ;
+V+Imperative+Sg:^σου # ;
+V+Imperative+Plur:^αστείτε # ;
+V+Part:^ηθεί # ;

LEXICON Noun
άποικος:αποικο NounMascOs ;
έθιμο:εθιμ NounNeutO ;
ήπειρος:ηπειρ NounMascOs ;
αέρας:αερ NounMascAs ;
αγριοκάτσικο:αγριοκατσικ NounNeutO ;
αδίκημα:αδικημα NounNeutMa ;
αδράνεια:αδρανει NounFemA ;
αιώνας:αιων NounMascAs ;
ακρόπολη:ακροπολ NounFemI ;
αλεξιπτωτιστής:αλεξιπτωτιστ NounMascIs ;
αλφαβητισμός:αλφαβητισμ NounNeutI ;
αναμέτρηση:αναμετρησ NounFemI ;
ανθρωπότητα:ανθρωποτητ NounFemA ;
αντίκτυπος:αντικτυπ NounMascOs ;
απογοήτευση:απογοητευσ NounFemI ;
απώλεια:απωλει NounFemA ;
αρχηγός:αρχηγο NounNeutI ;
αυτόχειρας:αυτοχειρ NounMascAs ;
αφέντης:αφεντ NounMascIs ;
βάρκα:βαρκ NounFemA ;
βίβλος:βιβλ NounMascOs ;
βελτίωση:βελτιωσ NounFemI ;
βομβαρδισμός:βομβαρδισμο NounNeutI ;
γνώρισμα:γνωρισ NounNeutMa ;
γραμματέας:γραμματεα NounMascAs ;
γραφείο:γραφει NounNeutO ;
δεξιός:δεξι NounNeutI ;
διάβημα:διαβη NounNeutMa ;
διαδηλωτής:διαδηλωτ NounMascIs ;
διακοίνωση:διακοινωσ NounFemI ;
διδασκόμενος:διδασκομεν NounMascOs ;
δικαιολογία:δικαιολογι NounFemA ;
δράστης:δραστ NounMascIs ;
δρέπανο:δρεπαν NounNeutO ;
είσπραξη:εισπραξ NounFemI ;
εαυτός:εαυτ NounNeutI ;
εκλέκτορας:εκλεκτορ NounMascAs ;
ενίσχυση:ενισχυσ NounFemI ;
ενθουσιασμός:ενθουσιασμ NounNeutI ;
εξτρεμιστής:εξτρεμιστ NounMascIs ;
επανάσταση:επανασταση NounFemI ;
επισκευαστής:επισκευαστ NounMascIs ;
επιτυχία:επιτυχι NounFemA ;
επιχείρημα:επιχειρη NounNeutMa ;
εποικονωνίας:εποικονωνι NounMascAs ;
εσωτερικό:εσωτερικ NounNeutO ;
ζητούμενος:ζητουμεν NounMascOs ;
ηγέτης:ηγετ NounMascIs ;
ιδιότητα:ιδιοτητ NounFemA ;
ισλαμιστής:ισλαμιστ NounMascIs ;
καρπός:καρπ NounNeutI ;
καταστατικό:καταστατικ NounNeutO ;
κατεύθυνση:κατευθυνσ NounFemI ;
κινητήρας:κινητηρ NounMascAs ;
κλίβανος:κλιβαν NounMascOs ;
κλίμα:κλι NounNeutMa ;
κομμουνιστής:κομμουνιστ NounMascIs ;
κτίριο:κτιρι NounNeutO ;
λατρεία:λατρει NounFemA ;
λουλούδι:λουλουδι NounNeutI ;
λύκος:λυκ NounMascOs ;
μήνυμα:μηνυμα NounNeutMa ;
μαθητής:μαθητ NounMascIs ;
μεσάζοντας:μεσαζοντ NounMascAs ;
μονοπώλιο:μονοπωλ NounNeutO ;
οδηγός:οδηγ NounNeutI ;
ομοιότητα:ομοιοτητ NounFemA ;
ομόλογος:ομολογ NounMascOs ;
πάπας:παπ NounMascAs ;
πάτωμα:πατω NounNeutMa ;
παράπονο:παραπον NounNeutO ;
παραγραφή:παραγραφ NounFemI ;
παραχαράκτης:παραχαρακτ NounMascIs ;
πειρασμός:πειρασμ NounNeutI ;
πολίτευμα:πολιτευ NounNeutMa ;
πολεμίστρα:πολεμιστρ NounFemA ;
πράκτορας:πρακτορ NounMascAs ;
πρακτορείο:πρακτορει NounNeutO ;
πυλώνας:πυλων NounMascAs ;
πόλος:πολ NounMascOs ;
ρεπουμπλικανός:ρεπουμπλικαν NounNeutI ;
σήμα:ση NounNeutMa ;
σοβαρότητα:σοβαροτητα NounFemA ;
σος:σ NounMascOs ;
σουνίτης:σουνιτ NounMascIs ;
στήριξη:στηριξη NounFemI ;
στόχαστρο:στοχαστρ NounNeutO ;
συνάλλαγμα:συναλλαγμα NounNeutMa ;
συναγερμός:συναγερμ NounNeutI ;
σύζυγος:συζυγ NounMascOs ;
τέρμα:τερμα NounNeutMa ;
τεκμήριο:τεκμηρ NounNeutO ;
τοιχογραφία:τοιχογραφι NounFemA ;
τομέας:τομε NounMascAs ;
τύπος:τυπο NounMascOs ;
υπνωτικός:υπνωτικ NounNeutI ;
υπογραφή:υπογραφ NounFemI ;
υπολογιστής:υπολογιστ NounMascIs ;
φάσμα:φασ NounNeutMa ;
φυτό:φυτ NounNeutO ;
χαρακτήρας:χαρακτηρ NounMascAs ;
όμηρος:ομηρ NounMascOs ;
όνομα:ονομα NounNeutMa ;
LEXICON Adj
άτυχος:ατυχ AdjOs2 ;
αβάσιμος:αβασιμ AdjOs2 ;
αγιορείτης:αγιορειτ AdjIs2 ;
ακατόρθωτος:ακατορθωτ AdjOs2 ;
αναφερόμενος:αναφερομεν AdjOs2 ;
απτός:απτ AdjOs1 ;
αρχαίος:αρχαι AdjOs2 ;
αυτόπτης:αυτοπτ AdjIs2 ;
βαθύς:βαθ AdjUs ;
βαρύς:βαρυ AdjUs ;
βλακώδης:βλακωδ AdjIs2 ;
γειτονικός:γειτονικ AdjOs1 ;
διαθέσιμος:διαθεσιμ AdjOs2 ;
δριμύς:δριμυ AdjUs ;
δυνατός:δυνατ AdjOs1 ;
εντυπωσιακός:εντυπωσιακ AdjOs1 ;
επικαλούμενος:επικαλουμεν AdjOs2 ;
ευρύς:ευρ AdjUs ;
ζωικός:ζωικ AdjOs1 ;
θεμελιώδης:θεμελιωδ AdjIs2 ;
θυελλώδης:θυελλωδ AdjIs2 ;
καθεστωτικός:καθεστωτικ AdjOs1 ;
κατάλληλος:καταλληλο AdjOs2 ;
κτιριακός:κτιριακ AdjOs1 ;
μακρύς:μακρ AdjUs ;
μαυροπετρίτης:μαυροπετριτ AdjIs2 ;
μοναστηριακός:μοναστηριακ AdjOs1 ;
νότιος:νοτι AdjOs2 ;
ουσιώδης:ουσιωδ AdjIs2 ;
πανευρωπαϊκός:πανευρωπαικ AdjOs1 ;
πλήρης:πληρ AdjIs2 ;
πλούσιος:πλουσι AdjOs2 ;
πολύς:π AdjUs ;
προκλητικός:προκλητικ AdjOs1 ;
συμβιβαστικός:συμβιβαστικ AdjOs1 ;
συνήθης:συνηθ AdjIs2 ;
συνεχιζόμενος:συνεχιζομεν AdjOs2 ;
ταχύς:ταχ AdjUs ;
τραγικός:τραγικ AdjOs1 ;
χρόνιος:χρονι AdjOs2 ;
LEXICON Verb
ανταλλάζω:ανταλλαζ VerbA ;
αποσύρω:αποσυρ VerbA ;
δανείζω:δανειζ VerbA ;
διοργανώνω:διοργανων VerbA ;
εμμένω:εμμεν VerbA ;
επεμβαίνω:επεμβαιν VerbA ;
θανατώνω:θανατων VerbA ;
καταστρέφω:καταστρεφ VerbA ;
μαζεύω:μαζευ VerbA ;
πέφτω:πεφτ VerbA ;
προσαρμόζω:προσαρμοζ VerbA ;
ταξιδεύω:ταξιδε VerbA ;
